en: Pet dietary requirements: Allergy & food sensitivity; Cardiovascular care; Dental health; Diabetes care; Digestive health; Gluten-free; Grain-free; Hairball control; High protein; Joint & mobility care; Kidney care; Liver care; Sensitive stomach; Skin & coat care; Thyroid care; Urinary health; Weight control; Other
nb: Krav for kjæledyrdiett: Allergi og matfølsomhet; Kardiovaskulær omsorg; Tannhelse; Pleie av diabetes; Fordøyelseshelse; Glutenfri; Kornfri; Hårballkontroll; Proteinrik; Ledd- og mobilitetsomsorg; Nyrepleie; Leverpleie; Følsom mage; Hud- og pelspleie; Pleie av skjoldbruskkjertelen; Urinhelse; Vektkontroll; Annen
bg-BG: Диетични изисквания за домашни любимци: Алергия и чувствителност към храни; Сърдечно-съдови грижи; Здраве на зъбите; Грижа за диабета; Здраве на храносмилателната система; Без глутен; Без зърнени култури; Контрол на топките от косми; Високо съдържание на протеини; Грижа за ставите и мобилността; Грижа за бъбреците; Грижа за черния дроб; Чувствителен стомах; Грижа за кожата и козината; Грижа за щитовидната жлеза; Здраве на пикочните пътища; Контрол на теглото; Други
fi: Lemmikkien ruokavaliovaatimukset: Allergia ja ruokaherkkyys; Sydän- ja verisuonihoito; Hampaiden terveys; Diabeteksen hoito; Ruoansulatuskanavan terveys; Gluteeniton; Viljaton; Karvapallojen hallinta; Korkeaproteiininen; Nivel- ja liikkuvuushoito; Munuaisten hoito; Maksan hoito; Herkkä vatsa; Iho ja turkki; Kilpirauhasen hoito; Virtsateiden terveys; Painonhallinta; Muu
cs: Požadavky z hlediska dietních omezení zvířat: Alergie a citlivost na potraviny; Kardiovaskulární péče; Dentální péče; Péče při cukrovce; Péče o zažívací trakt; Bez lepku; Bez obilovin; Proti trichobezoárům; Vysoký obsah bílkovin; Péče o klouby a pohyblivost; Péče o ledviny; Péče o játra; Citlivý žaludek; Péče o kůži a srst; Péče o štítnou žlázu; Zdraví močových cest; Přípravky na hubnutí, kontrolu tělesné hmotnosti; Jiné
sl-SI: Prehranske zahteve za hišne ljubljenčke: Alergija in občutljivost na hrano; Nega srca in ožilja; Zdravje zob; Nega sladkorne bolezni; Zdravje prebave; Brez glutena; Brez žitaric; Kontrola dlak; Visoka vsebnost beljakovin; Nega sklepov in gibljivosti; Skrb za ledvice; Nega jeter; Občutljiv želodec; Nega kože in dlake; Skrb za ščitnico; Zdravje sečil; Nadzor telesne teže; Drugo
hu: Kisállat étrendjére vonatkozó követelmények: Allergia és ételérzékenység; Szív- és érrendszer egészsége; Fogak egészsége; Cukorbetegség kezelése; Emésztőrendszer egészsége; Gluténmentes; Gabonamentes; Szőrgombócok kialakulásának csökkentése; Fehérjedús; Ízületek egészsége és a mozgás megkönnyítése; Vese egészsége; Máj egészsége; Érzékeny gyomor; Bőr és szőrzet ápolása; Pajzsmirigy egészsége; Húgyúti rendszer egészsége; Súlykontroll; Egyéb
zh-CN: 宠物饮食要求: 过敏和食物敏感性; 心血管护理; 牙齿健康; 糖尿病护理; 消化系统健康; 无麸质; 不含谷物; 去毛球; 高蛋白; 关节和行动护理; 肾脏护理; 肝脏护理; 胃部敏感; 皮肤和表皮护理; 甲状腺护理; 泌尿系统健康; 体重控制; 其他
sk-SK: Požiadavky na stravu pre domáce zvieratá: Alergia a citlivosť na potraviny; Kardiovaskulárna starostlivosť; Zdravie chrupu; Starostlivosť pri cukrovke; Zdravie tráviaceho traktu; Bezlepkový; Bez obilnín; Starostlivosť o srsť; Vysoký obsah bielkovín; Starostlivosť o kĺby a pohyblivosť; Starostlivosť o obličky; Starostlivosť o pečeň; Citlivý žalúdok; Starostlivosť o kožu a srsť; Starostlivosť o štítnu žľazu; Zdravie močových ciest; Kontrola hmotnosti; Iné
pl: Wymagania dietetyczne zwierząt domowych: Alergia i nadwrażliwość pokarmowa; Układ krążenia; Stan jamy ustnej; Opieka diabetologiczna; Zdrowie układu trawiennego; Bezglutenowy; Bez ziarna; Kontrola kulek sierści; Wysokobiałkowa; Opieka nad stawami i mobilnością; Opieka nefrologiczna; Opieka wątrobowa; Wrażliwy żołądek; Pielęgnacja skóry i sierści; Opieka tarczycowa; Zdrowie układu moczowego; Kontrola ciężaru; Pozostałe
ko: 반려동물 식단 요구사항: 알레르기 & 음식 민감성; 심혈관 관리; 치아 건강; 당뇨 관리; 소화기 건강; 글루텐프리; 그레인프리; 헤어볼 관리; 고단백; 관절 & 운동성 관리; 신장 관리; 간 관리; 민감성 위; 피부/털 관리; 갑상선 관리; 비뇨기 건강; 체중 조절; 기타
fr: Exigences alimentaires des animaux de compagnie: Allergie et sensibilité alimentaire; Soins cardiovasculaires; Santé dentaire; Traitements diabétiques; Santé digestive; Sans gluten; Sans céréales; Contrôle des boules de poils; Haute teneur en protéines; Soins des articulations et de la mobilité; Soins des reins; Soins du foie; Estomac sensible; Soins de la peau et du pelage; Soins de la thyroïde; Santé urinaire; Contrôle du poids; Autre
el: Διατροφικές απαιτήσεις για κατοικίδια: Αλλεργία και τροφική ευαισθησία; Καρδιαγγειακή φροντίδα; Οδοντική υγεία; Φροντίδα για τον διαβήτη; Πεπτική υγεία; Χωρίς γλουτένη; Χωρίς δημητριακά; Έλεγχος τριχοπιλήματος; Πλούσια σε πρωτεΐνες; Φροντίδα αρθρώσεων και κινητικότητας; Φροντίδα των νεφρών; Φροντίδα του συκωτιού; Ευαίσθητο στομάχι; Περιποίηση δέρματος και τριχώματος; Φροντίδα του θυρεοειδούς; Υγεία του ουροποιητικού; Έλεγχος βάρους; Άλλο
ru: Требования к питанию домашних животных: Аллергия и пищевая чувствительность; Здоровье сердечно-сосудистой системы; Здоровье зубов; Лечение диабета; Здоровье пищеварительной системы; Без глютена; Без злаков; Контроль за образованием комков шерсти; Высокое содержание белка; Подвижность и здоровье суставов; Здоровье почек; Здоровье печени; Чувствительный желудок; Уход за кожей и шерстью; Здоровье щитовидной железы; Здоровье мочевыводящих путей; Контроль веса; Другое
nl: Dieetbehoeften huisdieren: Allergie en voedselgevoeligheid; Cardiovasculaire zorg; Tandgezondheid; Diabeteszorg; Spijsverteringsgezondheid; Glutenvrij; Zonder granen; Haarbalbestrijding; Hoog proteïnegehalte; Gewrichts- en mobiliteitszorg; Nierzorg; Leverzorg; Gevoelige maag; Huid- en vachtverzorging; Schildklierzorg; Gezondheid van de urinewegen; Gewichtscontrole; Andere
pt-PT: Requisitos dietéticos para animais de estimação: Alergia e sensibilidade alimentar; Cuidados cardiovasculares; Saúde dentária; Cuidados com a diabetes; Saúde digestiva; Não tem glúten; Sem grãos; Controlo de bolas de pelo; Alto teor de proteína; Cuidados com articulações e mobilidade; Cuidados renais; Cuidados com o fígado; Estômago sensível; Pele e pelo; Cuidados com a tiróide; Saúde urinária; Controlo de peso; Outro
vi: Yêu cầu về chế độ ăn của thú cưng: Dị ứng và nhạy cảm với thực phẩm; Chăm sóc tim mạch; Sức khỏe răng miệng; Chăm sóc bệnh tiểu đường; Sức khỏe tiêu hóa; Không chứa gluten; Không có hạt; Bánh thưởng tiêu búi lông; Giàu đạm; Chăm sóc khớp và khả năng vận động; Chăm sóc thận; Chăm sóc gan; Dạ dày nhạy cảm; Chăm sóc da và lông; Chăm sóc tuyến giáp; Sức khỏe tiết niệu; Kiểm soát cân nặng; Khác
ro-RO: Cerințele alimentare pentru animalele de companie: Alergii și sensibilitate alimentară; Îngrijirea cardiovasculară; Sănătatea dinților; Tratarea diabetului; Sănătatea digestivă; Fără gluten; Fără cereale; Controlul ghemurilor de blană; Bogat în proteine; Îngrijirea articulațiilor și a mobilității; Tratamentul rinichilor; Tratamentul ficatului; Stomac sensibil; Îngrijirea pielii și a blănii; Tratamentul tiroidei; Sănătatea urinară; Controlul greutății; Altele
da: Foderkrav til kæledyr: Allergi og fødevarefølsomhed; Kardiovaskulær pleje; Tandsundhed; Diabetespleje; Fordøjelsessundhed; Glutenfri; Kornfri; Hårboldkontrol; Højt proteinindhold; Led- og mobilitetspleje; Nyrepleje; Leverpleje; Sensitiv mave; Hud- og pelspleje; Skjoldbruskkirtelpleje; Urinsundhed; Vægtkontrol; Andet
de: Ernährungsanforderungen des Haustiers: Allergie und Nahrungsmittelunverträglichkeit; Herz-Kreislauf-Gesundheit; Zahngesundheit; Diabetesbehandlung; Gesundheit des Verdauungssystems; Glutenfrei; Getreidefrei; Haarballenkontrolle; Proteinreich; Gelenk- und Mobilitätspflege; Nierengesundheit; Lebergesundheit; Empfindlicher Magen; Haut- und Fellpflege; Schilddrüsengesundheit; Harngesundheit; Gewichtskontrolle; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 寵物飲食要求: 過敏與食物敏感性; 心血管護理; 牙齒健康; 糖尿病護理; 消化系統健康; 無麩質; 無穀物; 毛球控制; 高蛋白; 關節和活動護理; 腎臟護理; 肝臟護理; 腸胃敏感; 皮膚毛髮護理; 甲狀腺護理; 泌尿系統健康; 控制體重; 其他
tr: Evcil hayvan beslenme gereksinimleri: Alerji ve gıda hassasiyeti; Damar sağlığı; Diş sağlığı; Diyabet bakımı; Sindirim sağlığı; Glütensiz; Tahılsız; Tüy yumağı kontrolü; Yüksek protein; Eklem ve hareket bakımı; Böbrek sağlığı; Karaciğer sağlığı; Hassas mide; Cilt ve tüy bakımı; Tiroid sağlığı; İdrar sağlığı; Kilo kontrolü; Diğer
es: Requisitos dietéticos para mascotas: Alergia y sensibilidad alimentaria; Cuidado cardiovascular; Salud dental; Cuidado de la diabetes; Salud digestiva; Sin gluten; Sin granos; Control de bolas de pelo; Alto en proteínas; Cuidado de articulaciones y movilidad; Cuidado de los riñones; Cuidado del hígado; Estómago sensible; Cuidado de la piel y el pelaje; Cuidado de la tiroides; Salud urinaria; Control de peso; Otros
sv: Kostbehov för husdjur: Allergi och matkänslighet; Kardiovaskulär vård; Tandhälsa; Diabetesvård; Matsmältningshälsa; Glutenfri; Spannmålsfri; Hårbollskontroll; Hög protein; Led- och rörlighetsvård; Njurvård; Levervård; Känslig mage; Hud- och pälsvård; Sköldkörtelvård; Urinhälsa; Viktkontroll; Annat
th: ข้อกำหนดด้านอาหารสัตว์เลี้ยง: ภูมิแพ้และการแพ้อาหาร; ดูแลหัวใจและหลอดเลือด; สุขภาพฟัน; ดูแลโรคเบาหวาน; สุขภาพระบบย่อยอาหาร; ปราศจากกลูเตน; ปราศจากธัญพืช; สูตรควบคุมก้อนขน; โปรตีนสูง; ดูแลข้อต่อและการเคลื่อนไหว; ดูแลไต; ดูแลตับ; กระเพาะอาหารที่บอบบาง; ดูแลผิวหนังและขน; ดูแลต่อมไทรอยด์; สุขภาพทางเดินปัสสาวะ; การควบคุมน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
ja: ペットの必要栄養量: アレルギー・食物過敏症; 心臓血管ケア; 口腔衛生; 糖尿病ケア; 消化器の健康; グルテンフリー; 穀物不使用; ヘアーボールコントロール; 高タンパク; 関節と運動機能のケア; 腎臓ケア; 肝臓ケア; 敏感な胃; 皮膚と被毛のケア; 甲状腺のケア; 泌尿器の健康; 体重管理; その他
lt-LT: Gyvūnų mitybos reikalavimai: Alergija ir jautrumas maistui; Širdies ir kraujagyslių priežiūra; Dantų sveikata; Diabeto priežiūra; Virškinamojo trakto sveikata; Be glitimo; Be grūdų; Nuo plaukų gumuliukų skrandyje; Didelis baltymų kiekis; Sąnarių ir judrumo priežiūra; Inkstų priežiūra; Kepenų priežiūra; Jautrus skrandis; Odos ir kailio priežiūra; Skydliaukės priežiūra; Šlapimo sistemos sveikata; Svorio kontrolė; Kita
it: Esigenze alimentari degli animali domestici: Allergia e ipersensibilità alimentare; Cura cardiovascolare; Salute dentale; Cura del diabete; Salute dell'apparato digerente; Senza glutine; Senza cereali; Hairball control; Alto contenuto di proteine; Cura delle articolazioni e della mobilità; Cura dei reni; Cura del fegato; Per ridurre il bruciore di stomaco; Cura della pelle e del pelo; Cura della tiroide; Per il benessere dell'apparato urinario; Controllo del peso; Altro
hr-HR: Prehrambene potrebe kućnih ljubimaca: Alergija i osjetljivost na hranu; Kardiovaskularna njega; Zdravlje zubi; Tretiranje dijabetesa; Zdravlje probavnog sustava; Bez glutena; Bez žitarica; Kontrola kuglica dlake; Visoki udio bjelančevina; Zdravlje zglobova i pokretljivost; Zdravlje bubrega; Zdravlje jetre; Osjetljiv želudac; Njega kože i dlake; Zdravlje štitnjače; Zdravlje mokraćnog sustava; Kontrola tjelesne težine; Ostalo
pt-BR: Requisitos dietéticos para animais de estimação: Alergia e sensibilidade alimentar; Cuidados cardiovasculares; Saúde bucal; Cuidados com diabetes; Saúde digestiva; Sem glúten; Não contém grãos; Controle de bola de pelo; Alto teor de proteínas; Cuidados com articulações e mobilidade; Cuidados renais; Cuidados com o fígado; Dieta para estômago sensível; Cuidados com a pele e pelagem; Cuidados com a tireoide; Saúde do trato urinário; Controle de peso; Outro